Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2757YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 592 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 808.3A Application for consent to 1 forensic interview. 2 Law enforcement may make application to the court for 3 consent to conduct a forensic interview of a minor at a 4 licensed child advocacy center when the suspect of a crime 5 is the parent, guardian, or custodian of the minor. The 6 application shall describe the nature of the crime being 7 investigated, why a forensic interview of the minor is 8 necessary, attempts made by law enforcement to gain consent 9 from any parent, guardian, or custodian, and why consent cannot 10 be obtained any other way. An application shall be supported 11 by the personâs oath or affirmation, shall include specific and 12 articulable facts, and, when reviewed with rational inferences 13 from the application, demonstrate a forensic interview as 14 part of an investigation is warranted. For purposes of this 15 section, âminorâ means a person under eighteen years of age. 16